Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2044.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-2926, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2926. Abandonment or concealment of a dead body; classification A. It is unlawful for a person to knowingly move a dead human body or parts of a human body with the intent to abandon or conceal the dead human body or parts. B. This section does not apply to either of the following: 1B. This section does not apply to [either of the following: 1. The disposition, transportation or other handling of dead human remains for any purpose authorized under title 32, chapter 12, title 32, chapter 20, article 6 and title 36, chapters 3 and 7. 2. The mother of an unborn child if the gestational age of the unborn child at the time of the disposition, transportation or other handling [2. The mother of an unborn child if the gestational age of the unborn child at the time of the disposition, transportation or other handling is less than twenty weeks. C. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 5 felony, except that a person who mutilates, disfigures or dismembers a dead human body with the intent to conceal a crime or avoid apprehension for a crime or who causes the death of a person before abandoning or concealing the dead human body or parts is guilty of a class 2 felony. END_STATUTE